Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Cross references.

Securing of attendance of prisoners at trials, §

24-13-60

et seq.

Criminal Justice Coordinating Council, T. 35, C. 6A.

Power of municipal corporations to confine persons convicted of violating municipal ordinances, §

36-30-8

.

Law reviews.

For note, “Translating the Eighth Amendment Standard:
The First Circuit’s Denial of a Transgender Prisoner’s Constitutional Right to Medical Treatment,” see 51 Ga. L. Rev. 585 (2017).